Nevada, session 83, SB214.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 455.092 is hereby amended to read as follows:
455.092 1. “Excavation” means the movement or removal of
earth, rock or other material in or on the ground by:
(a) Use of mechanical equipment;
(b) Use of non-mechanical equipment by:
(1) A contractor; or
(2) Any person, other than a contractor, if at any point the
movement or removal of such material occurs more than [12] 18
inches below the surface of the original groundline; or
(c) The placement and discharge of explosives.
2. The term includes augering, backfilling, boring, digging,
ditching, drilling, grading, plowing-in, ripping, scraping, trenching
and tunneling.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB214*